Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.215

Adoption of rules for settlement conferences in civil cases.

By January 1, 1982, the supreme court shall adopt rules for settlement conferences in civil cases in such superior courts and the court of appeals which are amenable to the settlement conference process.

[ 1981 c 331 s 5.]

NOTES:

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—Severability—1981 c 331: See notes following RCW 2.32.070.

Adoption of rules for discovery in civil cases in courts of limited jurisdiction: RCW 3.02.050.